Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,174
Applicability of act.

The Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act applies to all domestic corporations in existence on January 1, 1997, that were incorporated under Chapter 21, article 19 and to any not-for-profit corporations in existence on January 1, 1997, that were heretofore organized under any laws repealed by Laws 1959, LB 349.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 174.